Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 10 Cooperative Marketing Associations

Cross references. —

As to mutual and cooperative associations, see art. 10, § 10, Wyo. Const.

As to agriculture, livestock and other animals generally, see title 11.

As to farm mutual property insurers, see chapter 26 of title 26.

As to inapplicability of minimum wage law to agricultural employees, see §

27-4-201

.

Severability. —

Laws 1923, ch. 83, § 25, provides: “If any section of this act shall be declared unconstitutional for any reason, the remainder of the act shall not be affected thereby.”

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1923, ch. 83, § 28, provides: “All acts or parts of acts in conflict with this act are hereby repealed.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

18 Am. Jur. 2d Cooperative Associations § 1 et seq; 18A Am. Jur. 2d Corporations §§ 166, 167.

Cooperative marketing of farm products by producers' association, 12 ALR2d 130.

Validity and construction of provision for liquidated damages in contract with cooperative marketing association, 12 ALR2d 130.

Construction and effect of cooperative farm agreement with respect to association's charges and deductions for gathering, grading, processing, shipping and marketing the products, 90 ALR2d 1142.

Rights in equity credits or patronage dividends, 50 ALR3d 435.

Validity and enforceability of bylaw amendment reducing benefits available to members, 61 ALR3d 976.

Liability of member or former member of marketing or purchasing cooperative for its debts or losses, 96 ALR3d 1243.

43 C.J.S. Industrial Co-operative Societies § 1 et seq.